California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 575, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 2750)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

399.20.5.

(a) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) and paragraph (2) of subdivision (j) of Section 399.20, a conduit hydroelectric facility with an effective capacity of up to four megawatts that otherwise meets the requirements of Section 399.20 shall be eligible for the standard contract or tariff established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 399.20 if the electric generation facility meets all the following additional requirements:

(1) It was operational as of January 1, 1990.

(2) It delivers no more than three megawatts to the grid at any time.

(3) It complies with the electrical corporation’s
 Electric Rule 21 tariff or other distribution access tariff.

(b) A facility meeting the requirements of subdivision (a) shall receive payment pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 399.20, provided that no payment shall be made for any electricity delivered to the grid in excess of three megawatts at any time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 665, Sec. 1.   (AB 1979)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

399.21.

(a) The commission, by rule, shall authorize the use of renewable energy credits to satisfy the renewables portfolio standard procurement requirements established pursuant to this article, subject to the following conditions:

(1) The commission and the Energy Commission shall ensure that the tracking system established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 399.25, is operational, is capable of independently verifying that electricity earning the credit is generated by an eligible renewable energy resource, and can ensure that renewable energy credits shall not be double counted by any seller of electricity within the service territory of the WECC.

(2) Each renewable energy credit shall be counted only once for compliance with the renewables portfolio standard of this state or any other state, or for verifying retail product claims in this state or any other state.

(3) All revenues received by an electrical corporation for the sale of a renewable energy credit shall be credited to the benefit of ratepayers.

(4) Renewable energy credits shall not be created for electricity generated pursuant to any electricity purchase contract with a retail seller or a local publicly owned electric utility executed before January 1, 2005, unless the contract contains explicit terms and conditions specifying the ownership or disposition of those credits. Procurement under those
 contracts shall be tracked through the accounting system described in subdivision (b) of Section 399.25 and included in the quantity of eligible renewable energy resources of the purchasing retail seller pursuant to Section 399.15.

(5) Renewable energy credits shall not be created for electricity generated under any electricity purchase contract executed after January 1, 2005, pursuant to the federal Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act of 1978 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.). Procurement under the electricity purchase contracts shall be tracked through the accounting system implemented by the Energy Commission pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 399.25 and count toward the renewables portfolio standard procurement requirements of the purchasing retail seller.

(6) Nothing in the amendments to this article made by the Clean Energy and Pollution Reduction Act of 2015 (Senate Bill 350 of the 2015–16 Regular Session) is intended to change commission Decision 11-12-052 regarding the classification of renewable energy credits from generation on the customer side of the meter.

(7) A renewable energy credit shall not be eligible for compliance with a renewables portfolio standard procurement requirement
 unless it is retired in the tracking system established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 399.25 by the retail seller or local publicly owned electric utility within 36 months from the initial date of generation of the associated electricity.

(b) The commission shall allow an electrical corporation to recover the reasonable costs of purchasing, selling, and administering renewable energy credit contracts in rates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 547, Sec. 23.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

399.22.

(a) For purposes of this section, “state agency” means any state agency, board, department, or commission, including the entities specified in subdivision (a) of Section 15814.12 of the Government Code.

(b) A state agency generating electricity from an electric generation facility, as defined in Section 387.6 or 399.20, that operates under a tariff adopted pursuant to either of those sections, and that is owned by, operated by, or on property under the control of, the state agency shall take the total annual amount of kilowatthours exported to the grid into consideration when determining whether the state agency has achieved the policy goals and objectives established by law
 for the state agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 474, Sec. 1.   (AB 2724)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

399.24.

(a) To meet the energy and transportation needs of the state, the commission shall adopt policies and programs that promote the in-state production and distribution of biomethane. The policies and programs shall facilitate the development of a variety of sources of in-state biomethane.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “biomethane” means biogas that meets the standards adopted pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 25421 of the Health and Safety Code for injection into a common carrier pipeline.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 602, Sec. 5.   (AB 1900)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

399.25.

The Energy Commission shall do all of the following:

(a) Certify eligible renewable energy resources that it determines meet the criteria described in subdivision (e) of Section 399.12.

(b) Design and implement an accounting system to verify compliance with the renewables portfolio standard by retail sellers and local publicly owned electric utilities, to ensure that electricity generated by an eligible renewable energy resource is counted only once for the purpose of meeting the renewables portfolio standard of this state or any other state, to certify renewable energy credits produced by eligible renewable energy resources, and to verify retail
 product claims in this state or any other state. In establishing the guidelines governing this accounting system, the Energy Commission shall collect data from electricity market participants that it deems necessary to verify compliance of retail sellers and local publicly owned electric utilities, in accordance with the requirements of this article and the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). In seeking data from electrical corporations, the Energy Commission shall request data from the commission. The commission shall collect data from electrical corporations and remit the data to the Energy Commission within 90 days of the request.

(c) Establish a system for tracking and verifying renewable energy credits that, through the use of independently audited data, verifies
 the generation of electricity associated with each renewable energy credit and protects against multiple counting of the same renewable energy credit. The Energy Commission shall consult with other western states and with the WECC in the development of this system.

(d) Certify, for purposes of compliance with the renewables portfolio standard requirements by a retail seller, the eligibility of renewable energy credits associated with eligible renewable energy resources procured by a local publicly owned electric utility, if the Energy Commission determines that all of the conditions of Section 399.31 have been met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 397.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

399.26.

(a) In order for the state to meet the requirements of the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program, substantially increased amounts of electricity generated by eligible renewable energy resources must be integrated with, and interconnected to, the transmission grid that is either owned by, or under the operational control of, the local publicly owned electric utilities and the transmission grid that is under the operational control of the Independent System Operator.

(b) The Independent System Operator and the balancing authority of each area in California shall do both of the following:

(1) Work cooperatively to integrate and
 interconnect eligible renewable energy resources to the transmission grid by the most efficient means possible with the goal of minimizing the impact and cost of new transmission needed to meet both reliability needs and the renewables portfolio standard procurement requirements.

(2) Accomplish the requirements of paragraph (1) in a manner that respects the ownership, business, and dispatch models for transmission facilities owned by electrical corporations, local publicly owned electric utilities, joint powers agencies, and independent transmission companies.

(c) The Independent System Operator shall seek any approvals from the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission that are necessary to accomplish the goals and requirements of this article.

(d) In order to maintain electric service reliability and to minimize the
 construction of fossil fuel electrical generation capacity to support the integration of intermittent renewable electrical generation into the electrical grid, by July 1, 2011, the commission shall determine the effective load carrying capacity of wind and solar energy resources on the California electrical grid. The commission shall use those effective load carrying capacity values in establishing the contribution of wind and solar energy resources toward meeting the resource adequacy requirements established pursuant to Section 380.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 28.   (SB 2 1x)   Effective December 10, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

399.30.

(a) (1) To fulfill unmet long-term generation resource needs, each local publicly owned electric utility shall adopt and implement a renewable energy resources procurement plan that requires the utility to procure a minimum quantity of electricity products from eligible renewable energy resources, including renewable energy credits, as a specified percentage of total kilowatthours sold to the utility’s retail end-use customers, each compliance period, to achieve the targets of subdivision (c).

(2) Beginning January 1, 2019, a local publicly owned electric utility subject to Section 9621 shall incorporate the renewable energy resources procurement plan required by
 this section as part of a broader integrated resource plan developed and adopted pursuant to Section 9621.

(b) The governing board shall implement procurement targets for a local publicly owned electric utility that require the utility to procure a minimum quantity of eligible renewable energy resources for each of the following compliance periods:

(1) January 1, 2011, to December 31, 2013, inclusive.

(2) January 1, 2014, to December 31, 2016, inclusive.

(3) January 1, 2017, to December 31, 2020, inclusive.

(4) January 1, 2021, to December 31, 2024, inclusive.

(5) January 1, 2025, to December 31, 2027, inclusive.

(6) January 1, 2028, to December 31, 2030, inclusive.

(c) The governing board of a local publicly owned electric utility shall ensure all of the following:

(1) The quantities of eligible renewable energy resources to be procured for the compliance period from January 1, 2011, to December 31, 2013, inclusive, are equal to an average of 20 percent of retail sales.

(2) The quantities of eligible renewable energy resources to be procured for all other compliance periods reflect reasonable progress in each of the intervening years sufficient to ensure that the procurement of electricity products from
 eligible renewable energy resources achieves 25 percent of retail sales by December 31, 2016, 33 percent by December 31, 2020, 44 percent by December 31, 2024, 52 percent by December 31, 2027, and 60 percent by December 31, 2030. The Energy Commission shall establish appropriate multiyear compliance periods for all subsequent years that require the local publicly owned electric utility to procure not less than 60 percent of retail sales of electricity products from eligible renewable energy resources.

(3) A local publicly owned electric utility shall adopt procurement requirements consistent with Section 399.16.

(4) Beginning January 1, 2014, in calculating the procurement requirements under this article, a local publicly owned electric utility may exclude from its total retail
 sales the kilowatthours generated by an eligible renewable energy resource that is credited to a participating customer pursuant to a voluntary green pricing or shared renewable generation program. Any exclusion shall be limited to electricity products that do not meet the portfolio content criteria set forth in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 399.16. Any renewable energy credits associated with electricity credited to a participating customer shall not be used for compliance with procurement requirements under this article, shall be retired on behalf of the participating customer, and shall not be further sold, transferred, or otherwise monetized for any purpose. To the extent possible for generation that is excluded from retail sales under this subdivision, a local publicly owned electric utility shall seek to procure those eligible renewable energy resources that are located
 in reasonable proximity to program participants.

(d) (1) The governing board of a local publicly owned electric utility shall adopt procurement requirements consistent with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of, and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of, Section 399.13.

(2) The governing board of a local publicly owned electric utility may adopt the following measures:

(A) Conditions that allow for delaying timely compliance consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 399.15.

(B) Cost limitations for procurement expenditures consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 399.15.

(e) The
 governing board of the local publicly owned electric utility shall adopt a program for the enforcement of this article. The program shall be adopted at a publicly noticed meeting offering all interested parties an opportunity to comment. Not less than 30 days’ notice shall be given to the public of any meeting held for purposes of adopting the program. Not less than 10 days’ notice shall be given to the public before any meeting is held to make a substantive change to the program.

(f) Each local publicly owned electric utility shall annually post notice, in accordance with the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), whenever its governing body will deliberate in public on its renewable energy resources procurement plan.

(g) A public utility district that receives all of its electricity pursuant to a preference right adopted and authorized by the United States Congress pursuant to Section 4 of the Trinity River Division Act of August 12, 1955 (Public Law 84-386), shall be in compliance with the renewable energy procurement requirements of this article.

(h) For a local publicly owned electric utility that was in existence on or before January 1, 2009, that provides retail electric service to 15,000 or fewer customer accounts in California, and is interconnected to a balancing authority located outside this state but within the WECC, an eligible renewable energy resource includes a facility that is located outside California that is connected to the WECC transmission system, if all of the following conditions
 are met:

(1) The electricity generated by the facility is procured by the local publicly owned electric utility, is delivered to the balancing authority area in which the local publicly owned electric utility is located, and is not used to fulfill renewable energy procurement requirements of other states.

(2) The local publicly owned electric utility participates in, and complies with, the accounting system administered by the Energy Commission pursuant to this article.

(3) The Energy Commission verifies that the electricity generated by the facility is eligible to meet the renewables portfolio standard procurement requirements.

(i) Notwithstanding subdivision
 (a), for a local publicly owned electric utility that is a joint powers authority of districts established pursuant to state law on or before January 1, 2005, that furnishes electric services other than to residential customers, and is formed pursuant to the Irrigation District Law (Division 11 (commencing with Section 20500) of the Water Code), the percentage of total kilowatthours sold to the district’s retail end-use customers, upon which the renewables portfolio standard procurement requirements in subdivision (b) are calculated, shall be based on the authority’s average retail sales over the previous seven years. If the authority has not furnished electric service for seven years, then the calculation shall be based on average retail sales over the number of completed years during which the authority has provided electric service.

(j) A local publicly owned electric utility in a city and county that only receives greater than 67 percent of its electricity sources from hydroelectric generation located within the state that it owns and operates, and that does not meet the definition of a “renewable electrical generation facility” pursuant to Section 25741 of the Public Resources Code, shall be required to procure eligible renewable energy resources, including renewable energy credits, to meet only the electricity demands unsatisfied by its hydroelectric generation in any given year, in order to satisfy its renewable energy procurement requirements.

(k) (1) For purposes of this subdivision, “large hydroelectric generation” means electricity generated from an existing hydroelectric facility located within the state that does not qualify as
 an eligible renewable energy resource and, as of January 1, 2018, was owned by a local publicly owned electric utility, the federal government as a part of the federal Central Valley Project, or a joint powers agency formed and created pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(2) If, during a year within a compliance period set forth in subdivision (b), a local publicly owned electric utility receives more than 40 percent of its retail sales from large hydroelectric generation under an ownership agreement or contract in effect as of January 1, 2018, it is not required to procure eligible renewable energy resources that exceed the lesser of the following for that year:

(A) The portion
 of the local publicly owned electric utility’s retail sales unsatisfied by the local publicly owned electric utility’s large hydroelectric generation.

(B) The soft target adopted by the Energy Commission for the intervening years of the relevant compliance period.

(3) An extension or renewal of a procurement agreement shall not be eligible to count towards the determination that the local publicly owned electric utility receives more than 40 percent of its retail sales from large hydroelectric generation in any year. This paragraph shall not apply to any agreement in effect on January 1, 2015, between a local publicly owned electric utility and the Western Area Power Administration or federal government as part of the federal Central Valley Project.

(4) The Energy Commission shall adjust the total quantities of eligible renewable energy resources to be procured by a local publicly owned electric utility for a compliance period to reflect any reductions required pursuant to paragraph (2).

(5) This subdivision does not modify the compliance obligation of a local publicly owned electric utility to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 399.16.

(l) (1) (A) For purposes of this subdivision, “unavoidable long-term contracts and ownership agreements” means commitments for electricity from a coal-fired powerplant, located outside the state, originally entered into by a local publicly owned electric utility before June
 1, 2010, that is not subsequently modified to result in an extension of the duration of the agreement or result in an increase in total quantities of energy delivered during any compliance period set forth in subdivision (b).

(B) The governing board of a local publicly owned electric utility shall demonstrate in its renewable energy resources procurement plan required pursuant to subdivision (a) that any cancellation or divestment of the commitment would result in significant economic harm to its retail customers that cannot be substantially mitigated through resale, transfer to another entity, early closure of the facility, or other feasible measures.

(2) For the compliance period set forth in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), a local publicly owned electric utility meeting the requirement
 of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) may adjust its renewable energy procurement targets to ensure that the procurement of additional electricity from eligible renewable energy resources, in combination with the procurement of electricity from unavoidable long-term contracts and ownership agreements, does not exceed the total retail sales of the local publicly owned electric utility during that compliance period. The local publicly owned electric utility may limit its procurement of eligible renewable energy resources for that compliance period to no less than an average of 33 percent of its retail sales.

(3) The Energy Commission shall approve any reductions in procurement targets proposed by a local publicly owned electric utility if it determines that the requirements of this subdivision are satisfied.

(m) A local publicly owned electric utility shall retain discretion over both of the following:

(1) The mix of eligible renewable energy resources procured by the utility and those additional generation resources procured by the utility for purposes of ensuring resource adequacy and reliability.

(2) The reasonable costs incurred by the utility for eligible renewable energy resources owned by the utility.

(n) The Energy Commission shall adopt regulations specifying procedures for enforcement of this article. The regulations shall include a public process under which the Energy Commission may issue a notice of violation and correction against a local publicly owned
 electric utility for failure to comply with this article, and for referral of violations to the State Air Resources Board for penalties pursuant to subdivision (o).

(o) (1) Upon a determination by the Energy Commission that a local publicly owned electric utility has failed to comply with this article, the Energy Commission shall refer the failure to comply with this article to the State Air Resources Board, which may impose penalties to enforce this article consistent with Part 6 (commencing with Section 38580) of Division 25.5 of the Health and Safety Code. Any penalties imposed shall be comparable to those adopted by the commission for noncompliance by retail sellers.

(2) Any penalties collected by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to this article
 shall be deposited in the Air Pollution Control Fund and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be expended for reducing emissions of air pollution or greenhouse gases within the same geographic area as the local publicly owned electric utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 305, Sec. 2.   (SB 702)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

399.31.

A retail seller may procure renewable energy credits associated with deliveries of electricity by an eligible renewable energy resource to a local publicly owned electric utility, for purposes of compliance with the renewables portfolio standard requirements, if both of the following conditions are met:

(a) The local publicly owned electric utility has adopted and implemented a renewable energy resources procurement plan that complies with the renewables portfolio standard adopted pursuant to Section 399.30.

(b) The local publicly owned electric utility is procuring sufficient eligible renewable energy resources to satisfy the target standard, and will not fail
 to satisfy the target standard in the event that the renewable energy credit is sold to the retail seller.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 30.   (SB 2 1x)   Effective December 10, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

399.32.

(a) It is the policy of the state and the intent of the Legislature to encourage electrical generation from eligible renewable energy resources.

(b) As used in this section, “electric generation facility” means an electric generation facility located within the service territory of, and developed to sell electricity to, a local publicly owned electric utility, and that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) Has an effective capacity of not more than three megawatts.

(2) Is interconnected and operates in parallel with the electrical transmission and distribution grid.

(3) Is strategically located and interconnected to the electrical transmission and distribution grid in a manner that optimizes the deliverability of electricity generated at the facility to load centers.

(4) Is an eligible renewable energy resource pursuant to this article.

(c) A local publicly owned electric utility that sells electricity at retail to 75,000 or more customers shall adopt a standard tariff for electricity purchased from an electric generation facility by July 1,
 2013.

(d) The governing board of the local publicly owned electric utility shall ensure that the tariff adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) reflects the value of every kilowatthour of electricity generated on a time-of-delivery basis, and shall consider avoided costs for distribution and transmission system upgrades, whether the facility generates electricity in a manner that offsets peak demand on the distribution circuit, and all current and anticipated environmental and greenhouse gases reduction compliance costs. The governing board may adjust this value based on the other attributes of renewable generation. The governing board shall ensure, with respect to rates and charges, that
 ratepayers that do not receive service pursuant to the tariff are indifferent to whether a ratepayer with an electric generation facility receives service pursuant to the tariff.

(e) A local publicly owned electric utility that sells electricity at retail to 75,000 or more customers shall make the tariff available to the owner or operator of an electric generation facility within the service territory of the utility, upon request, on a first-come-first-served basis, until the utility meets its proportionate share of a statewide cap of 750 megawatts cumulative rated generation capacity served under this section and Section 399.20. The proportionate share shall be calculated based on the ratio of the utility’s peak demand compared to the total statewide peak demand.

(f) The local
 publicly owned electric utility may make the terms of the tariff available to owners and operators of an electric generation facility in the form of a standard contract.

(g) Every kilowatthour of electricity purchased from an electric generation facility shall count toward meeting the local publicly owned electric utility’s renewables portfolio standard annual procurement targets for purposes of Section 399.30.

(h) (1) A local publicly owned electric utility may establish performance standards for any electric generation facility that has a capacity greater than one megawatt to ensure that those facilities are constructed, operated, and maintained to generate the expected annual net production of electricity and do not impact system reliability.

(2) A local publicly owned electric utility may reduce the three megawatt capacity limitation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) if the utility finds that a reduced capacity limitation is necessary.

(i) Within 10 days of receipt of a request for a tariff pursuant to this section from an owner or operator of an electric generation facility, the local publicly owned electric utility that receives the request shall post a copy of the request on its Internet Web site. The information posted on the Internet Web site shall include the name of the city in which the facility is located, but information that is proprietary and confidential, including, but not limited to, address information beyond the name of the city in which the facility is located, shall be redacted.

(j) A local publicly owned electric utility may deny a tariff request pursuant to this section if the local publicly owned electric utility makes any of the following findings:

(1) The electric generation facility does not meet the requirements of this section.

(2) The transmission or distribution grid that would serve as the point of interconnection is inadequate.

(3) The electric generation facility does not meet all applicable state and local laws and building standards, and utility interconnection requirements.

(4) The aggregate of all electric generating facilities on a distribution circuit
 would adversely impact utility operation and load restoration efforts of the distribution system.

(k) Upon receiving a notice of denial from a local publicly owned electric utility, the owner or operator of the electric generation facility denied a tariff pursuant to this section shall have the right to appeal that decision to the governing board of the local publicly owned electric utility.

(l) In order to ensure the safety and reliability of electric generation facilities, the owner of an electric generation facility receiving a tariff pursuant to this section shall provide an inspection and maintenance report to the local publicly owned electric utility at least once every other year. The inspection and maintenance report shall be prepared at the owner’s or operator’s expense by a California-licensed
 contractor who is not the owner or operator of the electric generation facility. A California-licensed electrician shall perform the inspection of the electrical portion of the generation facility.

(m) The contract between the electric generation facility receiving the tariff and the local publicly owned electric utility shall contain provisions that ensure that construction of the electric generating facility complies with all applicable state and local laws and building standards, and utility interconnection requirements.

(n) (1) All construction and installation of facilities of the local publicly owned electric utility, including at the point of the output meter or at the transmission or distribution grid, shall only be performed by that local publicly owned
 electric utility.

(2) All interconnection facilities installed on the local publicly owned electric utility’s side of the transfer point for electricity between the local publicly owned electric utility and the electrical conductors of the electric generation facility shall be owned, operated, and maintained only by the local publicly owned electric utility. The ownership, installation, operation, reading, and testing of revenue metering equipment for electric generating facilities shall be performed only by the local publicly owned electric utility.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 387.6 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 616, Sec. 1.   (SB 1332)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

399.33.

(a) This section shall only apply to a gas-fired powerplant that is located inside the state, is owned by and serves the electrical demands of a single local publicly owned electric utility, and meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The local publicly owned electric utility has outstanding public indebtedness associated with the powerplant, the powerplant was planned and built after January 1, 2000, and the debt was secured before January 1, 2017.

(2) Operating the powerplant below a 20-percent capacity factor on an annual average on a yearly basis may result in the loss of employment of
 a powerplant employee who receives a prevailing wage.

(3) The powerplant is subject to and meets the state’s greenhouse gases emission performance standard established by the Energy Commission pursuant to Section 8341.

(4) The powerplant is not located in a disadvantaged community. For purposes of this paragraph, “disadvantaged community” means a census tract that, pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, has received a score on the California Communities Environmental Health Screening 3.0, also known as CalEnviroScreen 3.0, in the 81st to 100th percentile, inclusive.

(5) The local publicly owned electric utility can demonstrate with official documentation, such as an adopted city council resolution, to
 the satisfaction of the Energy Commission, that the powerplant was built in response to the energy crisis of 2000–01.

(6) The powerplant has not undergone repowering and is not serving as a peaker powerplant.

(b) If the procurement requirements of this article require more than 50 percent of retail sales of electricity to come from eligible renewable energy resources, then a local publicly owned electric utility that is the sole owner of a powerplant that both meets the requirements of subdivision (a) and is operating below 20 percent of its total capacity on an average annual basis during a given compliance period may, based on the utility’s
 operations, adjust its renewable energy procurement targets by an amount equal to the difference between the actual generation from the powerplant and the amount of generation that the powerplant would have produced if it had operated at 20 percent of its total capacity, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The local publicly owned electric utility has procured eligible renewable energy resources as required by Section 399.30, as it existed on January 1, 2018.

(2) Additional procurement of eligible renewable energy resources or zero-carbon generational resources resulted
 in the powerplant operating at, or below, a 20-percent capacity factor on an annual average during a compliance period.

(3) The local publicly owned electric utility
 has attempted to mitigate against the reduction of generation to below 20 percent of the powerplant’s total capacity by attempting to sell the powerplant or attempting to sell the generation from the powerplant to the extent it is practicable and does not result in resource shuffling.

(c) A local publicly owned electric utility shall notify the Energy Commission by April 1, 2019, of its intent to act pursuant to the authorization granted by this section.

(d) The Energy Commission shall review, and either approve or reject, a publicly owned electric utility’s adjustment of its procurement targets pursuant to this section.

(e) The Energy Commission may request
 relevant supporting documentation from a local publicly owned electric utility acting pursuant to this section.

(f) This section shall apply only until the end of the calendar year during which the powerplant’s original term of bonded indebtedness expires.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (SB 1110)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Clean Energy and Pollution Reduction [400. - 400.3.]

400.

The commission and the Energy Commission shall do all of the following in furtherance of meeting the state’s clean energy and pollution reduction objectives:

(a) Take into account the use of distributed generation to the extent that it provides economic and environmental benefits in disadvantaged communities identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Take into account the opportunities to decrease costs and increase benefits, including pollution reduction and grid integration, using renewable and nonrenewable technologies with zero or lowest feasible emissions of greenhouse gases, criteria pollutants, and toxic air contaminants onsite in proceedings associated with meeting the objectives.

(c) Where feasible, authorize procurement of resources to provide grid reliability services that minimize reliance on system power and fossil fuel resources and, where feasible, cost effective, and consistent with other state policy objectives, increase the use of large- and small-scale energy storage with a variety of technologies, including green electrolytic hydrogen, targeted energy efficiency, demand response, including, but not limited to, automated demand response, eligible renewable energy resources, or other renewable and nonrenewable technologies with zero or lowest feasible emissions of greenhouse gases, criteria pollutants, and toxic air contaminants onsite to protect system reliability.

(d) (1) Review technology incentive, research, development, deployment, and market facilitation programs overseen by the commission and the Energy Commission and
 make recommendations to advance state clean energy and pollution reduction objectives and provide benefits to disadvantaged communities identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The Energy Commission shall review technology incentive, research, development, deployment, and market facilitation programs operating in California and overseen by academia and the private and nonprofit sectors, and make recommendations to advance state clean energy and pollution reduction objectives and provide benefits to disadvantaged communities identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) To the extent feasible and consistent with the state and federal constitutions, give first priority to the manufacture and deployment of clean energy and pollution reduction technologies that create employment opportunities in California, including high wage,
 highly skilled employment opportunities, and increased investment in the state.

(f) Establish a publicly available tracking system to provide up-to-date information at least once annually on progress toward meeting the clean energy and pollution reduction goals of the Clean Energy and Pollution Reduction Act of 2015.

(g) (1) Establish a disadvantaged community advisory group consisting of representatives from disadvantaged communities identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code. The disadvantaged community advisory group shall review and provide advice on programs proposed to achieve clean energy and pollution reduction and determine whether those proposed programs will be effective and useful in disadvantaged communities.

(2) Each member of the disadvantaged community
 advisory group shall receive per diem and shall be reimbursed for travel and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties under this section. The total amount of money expended for panel expenses pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per year.
